Florida, session 2026, SB1558.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 768.0427, Florida 15 Statutes, is amended to read: 16 768.0427âAdmissibility of evidence to prove medical 17 expenses in personal injury or wrongful death actions; 18 disclosure of letters of protection; recovery of past and future 19 medical expenses damages.â 20 (2)âADMISSIBLE EVIDENCE OF MEDICAL TREATMENT OR SERVICE 21 EXPENSES.âEvidence offered to prove or rebut the amount of 22 damages for past or future medical treatment or services in a 23 personal injury or wrongful death action is admissible as 24 follows: provided in this subsection. 25 (a)âEvidence offered to prove the amount of damages for 26 past medical treatment or services that have been satisfied is 27 limited to evidence of the amount actually paid, regardless of 28 the source of payment. 29 (b)âEvidence any party may offer offered to prove or rebut 30 the amount necessary to satisfy unpaid charges for incurred 31 medical treatment or services includes shall include, but is not 32 limited to, evidence as provided in this paragraph. 33 1.âIf the claimant has health care coverage other than 34 Medicare or Medicaid, evidence of the amount which such health 35 care coverage is obligated to pay the health care provider to 36 satisfy the charges for the claimantâs incurred medical 37 treatment or services, plus the claimantâs share of medical 38 expenses under the insurance contract or regulation. 39 2.âIf the claimant has health care coverage but obtains 40 treatment under a letter of protection or otherwise does not 41 submit charges for any health care providerâs medical treatment 42 or services to health care coverage, evidence of the amount the 43 claimantâs health care coverage would pay the health care 44 provider to satisfy the past unpaid medical charges under the 45 insurance contract or regulation, plus the claimantâs share of 46 medical expenses under the insurance contract or regulation, had 47 the claimant obtained medical services or treatment pursuant to 48 the health care coverage. 49 3.âIf the claimant does not have health care coverage or 50 has health care coverage through Medicare or Medicaid, evidence 51 of 120 percent of the Medicare reimbursement rate in effect on 52 the date of the claimantâs incurred medical treatment or 53 services, or, if there is no applicable Medicare rate for a 54 service, 170 percent of the applicable state Medicaid rate. 55 4.âIf the claimant obtains medical treatment or services 56 under a letter of protection and the health care provider 57 subsequently transfers the right to receive payment under the 58 letter of protection to a third party, evidence of the amount 59 the third party paid or agreed to pay the health care provider 60 in exchange for the right to receive payment pursuant to the 61 letter of protection. 62 5.âAny evidence of reasonable amounts billed to the 63 claimant for medically necessary treatment or medically 64 necessary services provided to the claimant. 65 (c)âEvidence any party may offer offered to prove or rebut 66 the amount of damages for any future medical treatment or 67 services the claimant will receive includes shall include, but 68 is not limited to, evidence as provided in this paragraph. 69 1.âIf the claimant has health care coverage other than 70 Medicare or Medicaid, or is eligible for any such health care 71 coverage, evidence of the amount for which the future charges of 72 health care providers could be satisfied if submitted to such 73 health care coverage, plus the claimantâs share of medical 74 expenses under the insurance contract or regulation. 75 2.âIf the claimant does not have health care coverage or 76 has health care coverage through Medicare or Medicaid, or is 77 eligible for such health care coverage, evidence of 120 percent 78 of the Medicare reimbursement rate in effect at the time of 79 trial for the medical treatment or services the claimant will 80 receive, or, if there is no applicable Medicare rate for a 81 service, 170 percent of the applicable state Medicaid rate. 82 3.âAny evidence of reasonable future amounts to be billed 83 to the claimant for medically necessary treatment or medically 84 necessary services. 85 (d)âThis subsection does not impose an affirmative duty 86 upon any party to offer any specific evidence made admissible by 87 this subsection or to seek a reduction in billed charges to 88 which the party is not contractually entitled. 89 (e)âIndividual contracts between providers and authorized 90 commercial insurers or authorized health maintenance 91 organizations are not subject to discovery or disclosure and are 92 not admissible into evidence. 93 Section 2.âThe amendments made by this act to s. 94 768.0427(2), Florida Statutes, apply to all causes of action to 95 which that subsection applies and are intended to clarify and 96 not materially alter that subsection. 97 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.